District of Columbia statutes.
29-1015.05

Filings required for merger; effective date.

(a)

After each constituent limited cooperative association has approved a merger, articles of merger shall be signed on behalf of each constituent association by an authorized representative.

(b)

The articles of merger shall include:

(1)

The name of each constituent limited cooperative association and the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is organized;

(2)

The name of the surviving limited cooperative association, the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is organized, and, if the surviving association is created by the merger, a statement to that effect;

(3)

The date the merger is to be effective;

(4)

If the surviving association is to be created by the merger and will be a domestic limited cooperative association, the limited cooperative association’s articles of organization;

(5)

If the surviving association is not created by the merger and is a domestic limited cooperative association, any amendments provided for in the plan of merger to its articles of organization;

(6)

A statement as to each constituent association that the merger was approved as required by its organic law;

(7)

If the surviving association is a foreign cooperative not authorized to do business in the District, the street address and, if different, mailing address of an office which the Mayor may use for the purposes of § 29-104.12; and

(8)

Any additional information required by the organic law of any constituent association.

(c)

Each limited cooperative association that is a party to a merger shall deliver the articles of merger to the Mayor for filing.

(d)

A merger shall be effective under this subchapter upon the later of:

(1)

Compliance with subsection (c) of this section; or

(2)

Subject to § 29-102.03, as specified in the articles of merger.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1015.04.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1609 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.